it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Rounder > Ausili per allenamenti per rounder: Tee da battuta per rounder; Macchine lanciapalle per rounder; Tavole da rimbalzo per rounder; Basi di allenamento per rounder; Reti da allenamento per rounder
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 라운더스 > 라운더스 훈련 장비: 라운더스 배팅 티; 라운더스 피칭 머신; 라운더스 리바운드 보드; 라운더스 트레이닝 베이스; 라운더스 훈련 네트
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Rounders > „Rounders“ treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės: „Rounders“ mušimo stoveliai; Rounderso metimo mašinos; „Rounders“ atšokimo lentos; „Rounders“ treniruočių bazės; „Rounders“ treniruočių tinklai
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Rounders > Pripomočki za vadbo za rounders: Stojala za odbijanje za rounders; Stroji za metanje Rounders; Odbojne deske za rounders; Baze za vadbo za rounders; Mreže za vadbo za rounders
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Rounders > Tréningové pomôcky Rounders: Odpaľovacie stojany Rounders; Stroje na nadhadzovanie loptičiek; Odrazové steny Rounders; Tréningové základne Rounders; Tréningové siete na rounders
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 繞圈球 > 繞圈球訓練輔助用具: 繞圈球擊球座; 跑圈子遊戲發球機; 繞圈球籃板; 繞圈球訓練座; 跑圈子遊戲訓練網
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Rounders > Auxílios de treinamento para rounders: Apoios de rebatidas para rounders; Máquinas lançadoras para rounders; Placas de rebote para rounders; Bases de treinamento para rounders; Redes de treinamento para rounders
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Rounders > Rounders Eğitim Araçları: Rounders Vuruş Tişörtleri; Rounders atış makineleri; Rounders Rebound Tahtaları; Rounders Eğitim Kaleleri; Rounders antrenman fileleri
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Rounders > Rounders-harjoitteluvälineet: Rounders-tiit; Rounders-syöttökoneet; Rounders-palautuslaudat; Rounders-harjoittelupesät; Rounders-harjoitusverkot
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Rounders > Träningshjälpmedel för rounders: Slagtees för rounders; Bollmaskiner för brännboll; Returplattor för rounders; Träningsbaser för rounders; Träningsnät för brännboll
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Раундърс > Помощни средства за тренировка по раундърс: Уреди за слагане на топката при батиране за раундърс; Машини за хвърляне за раундърс; Табла за отскок за раундърс; Тренировъчни бази за раундърс; Тренировъчни мрежи за раундърс
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Slåball > Treningsutstyr for slåball: Balltrær for slåball; Kastemaskiner for rounders; Reboundbrett for slåball; Treningsbaser for slåball; Treningsnett for rounders
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Rounders > Rounders-Trainingshilfen: Rounders-Batting-Tees; Rounders-Wurfmaschinen; Rounders-Rebound Boards; Rounders-Trainingsstäbe; Rounders-Trainingsnetze
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Rounders > Articole pentru antrenament rounders: Teuri rounders; Mașini de aruncare pentru rounders; Plăci ricoșeu pentru rounders; Baze antrenament pentru rounders; Plase de antrenament pentru rounders
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Rounders > Rounders edzési segédeszközök: Rounders ütőállványok; Rounders adogatógépek; Rounders visszapattanó táblák; Rounders edzési alapok; Rounders edzőhálók
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Rounders > Pomagala za rounders trening: Stalak za rounders lopticu; Strojevi za rounders bacanje; Odbijajuće ploče za rounders; Baze za rounders trening; Mreže za rounders trening
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Cờ bạc > Dụng cụ hỗ trợ tập luyện rounders: Cột phát bóng rounders; Máy ném bóng Rounders; Ván bật lại tập luyện rounders; Đế tập luyện rounders; Lưới tập Rounders
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Rounders > Aides à l’entraînement au rounders: Tees de frappeurs de rounders; Lance-balles de rounders; Planches de rebond de rounders; Bases d’entraînement de rounders; Filets d’entraînement de rounders
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Ράουντερς (Rounders) > Βοηθήματα προπόνησης ράουντερς: Στηρίγματα μπάλας για ράουντερς; Μηχανήματα ρίψης μπάλας ράουντερς; Πίνακες αναπήδησης για ράουντερς; Βάσεις προπόνησης ράουντερς; Δίχτυα προπόνησης ράουντερς
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Rundbold > Træningshjælpemidler til rundbold: Rundboldbattingtees; Kastemaskiner til rundbold; Rundboldrebounds; Rundboldtræningsbaser; Træningsnet til rundbold
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Rounders > Auxiliares de treino para rounders: Suportes de rebatida para rounders; Máquinas de lançamento de rounders; Placas de ressalto para rounders; Bases de treino para rounders; Redes de treino de rounders
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 圆场球用具 > 圆场棒球训练辅助用品: 圆场棒球击球座; 绕圈球发球机; 圆场棒球反弹板; 圆场棒球训练基地; 绕圈球训练网
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Palant > Pomoce treningowe do gry rounders: Słupki do gry rounders; Maszyny do rzucania piłek do rounders; Odbijacze do gry rounders; Bazy treningowe do gry rounders; Siatki treningowe do rounders
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Pálkovaná > Tréninkové pomůcky na pálkovanou: Odpalovací stojany na pálkovanou; Nahrávací stroje na rounders; Odrážecí trenažéry na trénink pálkované; Tréninkové základny pro pálkovanou; Tréninkové sítě na rounders
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Rounders > Ayudas para el entrenamiento de rounders: Camisetas de bateo de rounders; Máquinas de lanzamiento de rounders; Tablas de rebote de rounders; Bases de entrenamiento de rounders; Redes de entrenamiento de rounders
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Rounders > Rounders Training Aids: Rounders Batting Tees; Rounders Pitching Machines; Rounders Rebound Boards; Rounders Training Bases; Rounders Training Nets
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Английская лапта > Тренировочный инвентарь для английской лапты: Подставки для мячей для отработки ударов; Пушки для подачи мячей для раундерса; Тренажеры-стенки для английской лапты; Базы для тренировок по английской лапте; Тренировочные сетки для раундерса
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > ราวน์เดอร์ > อุปกรณ์ช่วยฝึกซ้อมเราเดอร์: แท่นตั้งตีเราเดอร์; เครื่องขว้างลูกราวน์เดอร์ส; กระดานเด้งลูกเราเดอร์; ฐานฝึกซ้อมเราเดอร์; ตาข่ายฝึกราวน์เดอร์ส
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > ラウンダーズ > ラウンダーズ練習器具: ラウンダーズ用バッティングティー; ラウンダーズ用ピッチングマシン; ラウンダーズ用リバウンドボード; ラウンダーズ用トレーニングベース; ラウンダーズ用トレーニングネット
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Rounders > Rounders-trainingshulpmiddelen: Rounders-slagpalen; Ballenmachines voor slagbal; Rounders-reboundborden; Rounders-trainingsbases; Trainingsnetten voor slagbal